Maryland, session 2026, HB1453.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1453*

HOUSE BILL 1453
Article – State Government
9–1A–24.
(H) (1) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS GOVERNING THE
EXTENSION OF CREDIT TO A PLAYER BY A VIDEO LOTTERY OPERATION LICENSEE.
(2) THE REGULATIONS SHALL REQUIRE:
(I) VIDEO LOTTERY OPERATION LICENSEES TO INCLUDE AND
PROMINENTLY DISPLAY ON CREDIT APPLICATIONS BY PLAYERS THE WORDS “IF YOU
OR SOMEONE YOU KNOW HAS A GAMBLING PROBLEM AND WANTS HELP, CALL
1–800–GAMBLER” OR COMPARABLE LANGUAGE APPROVED BY THE COMMISSION;
AND
(II) VIDEO LOTTERY OPERATION LICENSEES TO CONDUCT
ADDITIONAL REVIEW FOLLOWING INSTANCES WHERE THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF
PAYMENTS FOR OUTSTANDING CREDIT IS IN EXCESS OF THE PLAYER’S NET WORTH
AND NET WINNINGS AT THE VIDEO LOTTERY FACILITY.
(3) (I) THE COMMISSION SHALL ESTABLISH A CENTRAL LIST OF
PLAYERS FOR WHOM EACH VIDEO LOTTERY OPERATION LICENSEE HAS APPROVED
AN EXTENSION OF CREDIT OR AUTHORIZED COUNTER CHECK PRIVILEGES AND THE
AMOUNT OF CREDIT EXTENDED TO EACH PLAYER BY THE VIDEO LOTTERY
OPERATION LICENSEE.
(II) THE COMMISSION SHALL REQUIRE EACH VIDEO LOTTERY
OPERATION LICENSEE TO SUBMIT PLAYER INFORMATION IN A TIMELY MANNER FOR
INCLUSION ON THE LIST DESCRIBED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH.
(III) EACH VIDEO LOTTERY OPERATION LICENSEE SHALL
MONITOR THE LIST DESCRIBED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH TO
ENSURE THAT, CUMULATIVELY, THE VIDEO LOTTERY OPERATION LICENSEES HAVE
NOT EXTENDED A PLAYER AMOUNTS OF CREDIT THAT EXCEED THE PLAYER’S NET
WORTH.
9–1A–25.
(a) The Commission may deny a license to an applicant, reprimand or fine a
licensee, or suspend or revoke a license for a violation of:
(1) this subtitle;

HOUSE BILL 1453 3
(2) a regulation adopted under this subtitle; or
(3) a condition that the Commission sets.
(b) (1) For each violation specified in subsection (a) of this section, the
Commission may impose a penalty not exceeding [$5,000] $50,000.
(2) Each day that a person is in violation under this section shall be
considered a separate violation.
(3) To determine the amount of the penalty imposed under paragraph (1)
of this subsection, the Commission shall consider:
(i) the seriousness of the violation;
(ii) the harm caused by the violation; and
(iii) the good faith or lack of good faith of the person who committed
the violation.
(c) Except as otherwise expressly provided in this subtitle, nothing contained in
this subtitle abrogates or limits the criminal laws of the State or limits the authority of the
General Assembly to enact statutes establishing criminal offenses and penalties relating to
video lottery operations.
9–1D–04.
(a) A fantasy competition operator shall retain [85%] 84% of the proceeds and
pay the remainder to the Commission.
(b) (1) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE Commission shall distribute the proceeds paid under subsection (a) of
this section to the Blueprint for Maryland’s Future Fund established under § 5–206 of the
Education Article.
(2) THE COMMISSION SHALL DISTRIBUTE 1% OF THE PROCEEDS
FROM FANTASY COMPETITIONS TO THE PROBLEM GAMBLING FUND ESTABLISHED
UNDER § 9–1A–33 OF THIS TITLE.
9–1E–08.
(a) The Commission may deny a license to an applicant for a license under §
9–1E–05 of this subtitle, reprimand or fine a licensee, or suspend or revoke a license for a
violation of:
(1) this subtitle;

HOUSE BILL 1453
(2) a regulation adopted under this subtitle; or
(3) a condition that the Commission sets.
(b) For each violation specified in subsection (a) of this section, the Commission
may impose a penalty not exceeding [$5,000] $50,000.
(c) Each day that a person is in violation under this section shall be considered a
separate violation.
(d) To determine the amount of the penalty imposed under subsection (b) of this
section, the Commission shall consider:
(1) the seriousness of the violation;
(2) the harm caused by the violation; and
(3) the good faith or lack of good faith of the person who committed the
violation.
(e) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, nothing contained in this
subtitle abrogates or limits the criminal laws of the State or limits the authority of the
General Assembly to enact statutes establishing criminal offenses and penalties relating to
sports wagering operations.
9–1E–09.
(F) A SPORTS WAGERING LICENSEE MAY NOT ACCEPT A WAGER FROM AN
INDIVIDUAL ON ANY ONE SPORTING EVENT IN EXCESS OF $100,000.
9–1E–11.
(b) For online sports wagering, a mobile sports wagering licensee:
(1) shall:
[(1)] (I) have in place technical and operational measures to prevent
access by individuals who are underage or physically located outside the State, including:
[(i)] 1. age verification procedures, which may require the use of
a reputable independent third party that is in the business of verifying an individual’s
personally identifiable information; and
[(ii)] 2. the use of geolocation technology to verify a bettor’s
geographic location;

HOUSE BILL 1453 5
[(2)] (II) include on its online sports wagering website a description of the
possible repercussions for an underage or out–of–state bettor, which may include
immediate stoppage of play, account closure, and forfeiture and confiscation of winnings;
and
[(3)] (III) establish procedures to prevent prohibited individuals from
wagering on sporting events; AND
(2) MAY NOT ACCEPT A CREDIT CARD AS PAYMENT FOR ANY ONLINE
SPORTS WAGERING–RELATED TRANSACTIONS.
9–1E–12.
(b) (1) (i) Except as provided in subparagraphs (ii), (iii), and (iv) of this
paragraph, all proceeds from sports wagering shall be electronically transferred monthly
into the State Lottery Fund established under Subtitle 1 of this title.
(ii) A Class A–1 and A–2 sports wagering facility licensee shall
retain 85% of the proceeds from sports wagering conducted at the locations described in §
9–1E–09(a) of this subtitle.
(iii) A Class B–1 and B–2 sports wagering facility licensee shall
retain 85% of the proceeds from sports wagering conducted at the location described in the
licensee’s application.
(iv) A mobile sports wagering licensee shall retain 80% of the
proceeds from online sports wagering received by the licensee.
(2) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, all
proceeds from sports wagering in the State Lottery Fund established under Subtitle 1 of
this title shall be distributed on a monthly basis, on a properly approved transmittal
prepared by the Commission to the Blueprint for Maryland’s Future Fund established
under § 5–206 of the Education Article.
(ii) For fiscal year [2026] 2027 and each fiscal year thereafter[, 5%]:
1. 4% of the proceeds [attributable to mobile] FROM ONLINE
sports wagering shall be deposited in the General Fund; AND
2. 1% OF THE PROCEEDS FROM ONLINE SPORTS
WAGERING SHALL BE DEPOSITED IN THE PROBLEM GAMBLING FUND ESTABLISHED
UNDER § 9–1A–33 OF THIS TITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.